Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.325

Entry of protection order data—Other than for extreme risk protection orders.

(1) The clerk of the court shall enter any protection order, including temporary protection orders, issued under this chapter into a statewide judicial information system on the same day such order is issued, if possible, but no later than the next judicial day.

(2) A copy of a protection order granted under this chapter, including temporary protection orders, must be forwarded immediately by the clerk of the court, by electronic means if possible, to the law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order must remain in the computer until the expiration date specified on the order. If the court has entered an order that prohibits the respondent from possessing or purchasing a firearm, the law enforcement agency shall also enter the order into the national instant criminal background check system and any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms. The order must remain in each system for the period stated in the order, and the law enforcement agency shall only expunge orders from the systems that have expired or terminated. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(3) The information entered into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system must include notice to law enforcement on whether the order was personally served, served by electronic means, served by publication, or served by mail.

(4) If a law enforcement agency receives a protection order for entry or service, but the order falls outside the agency's jurisdiction, the agency may enter and serve the order or may immediately forward it to the appropriate law enforcement agency for entry and service, and shall provide documentation back to the court verifying which law enforcement agency has entered and will serve the order.

[ 2021 c 215 s 42.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.